Utah statutes.
72-9-502.   Motor vehicles to stop at ports-of-entry -- Signs -- Exceptions -- Rulemaking -- By-pass permits.

(1)  Except under Subsection (3), a motor carrier operating a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 10,001 pounds or more or any motor vehicle carrying livestock as defined in Section 4-24-2 shall stop at a port-of-entry as required under this section.

(2)  The department may erect and maintain signs directing motor vehicles to a port-of-entry as provided in this section.

(3)  A motor vehicle required to stop at a port-of-entry under Subsection (1) is exempt from this section if:

(a)  the total one-way trip distance for the motor vehicle would be increased by more than 5% or three miles, whichever is greater if diverted to a port-of-entry; or

(b)  the motor vehicle is operating under a temporary port-of-entry by-pass permit issued under Subsection (4).

(4) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules for the issuance of a temporary port-of-entry by-pass permit exempting a motor vehicle from the provisions of Subsection (1) if the department determines that the permit is needed to accommodate highway transportation needs due to multiple daily or weekly trips in the proximity of a port-of-entry.

(b)  The rules under Subsection (4)(a) shall provide that one permit may be issued to a motor carrier for multiple motor vehicles.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

